Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.030

Facilities—Agreements—Fees.

(1) A public facilities district is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate (a) sports facilities, entertainment facilities, convention facilities, including without limitation any convention and trade center transferred from a public nonprofit corporation under RCW 36.100.230(1), or regional centers as defined in RCW 35.57.020, and (b) for districts formed after January 1, 2000, recreational facilities other than ski areas, together with contiguous parking facilities. The taxes that are provided for in this chapter may only be imposed for these purposes, including without limitation implementing any redemption, prepayment, or legal defeasance of outstanding obligations under RCW 36.100.230(3)(a).

(2) A public facilities district may enter into agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW for the design, financing, acquisition, development, construction, reconstruction, lease, remodeling, alteration, maintenance, equipping, reequipping, repair, operation, or management of such facilities and may enter into contracts under chapter 39.34 RCW where any party to the contract provides and operates such facilities for the other party or parties to the contract. A public facilities district may enter into agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW that will assist a public facilities district in the financing of all or any part of a district facility on such terms as may be determined by agreement between the respective parties, including without limitation by a loan, guaranty, or other financing agreement.

(3) Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit service system, a public facilities district may contract with a public or private entity for the operation or management of its public facilities.

(4) A public facilities district is authorized to use the supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any of its public facilities.

(5) A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for the use of its facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 15 s 4; 2003 c 376 s 1; 1999 c 165 s 16; 1995 1st sp.s. c 14 s 3; 1995 c 396 s 3; 1989 1st ex.s. c 8 s 3; 1988 ex.s. c 1 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Construction—2010 1st sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 36.100.010.

Severability—Effective dates—1995 1st sp.s. c 14: See notes following RCW 36.100.010.

Severability—1995 c 396: See note following RCW 36.100.010.